District of Columbia statutes.
10-1332

Establishment of the Wilson Building Foundation.

(a)

There is established in the District of Columbia the John A. Wilson Building Foundation (“Foundation”), a private-public nonprofit corporation.

(b)

The purposes of the Foundation are:

(1)

To develop a long-range plan for the use of the Wilson Building by the District government and by the public; and

(2)

To develop and implement a fundraising plan to pay for the renovation and restoration of the Wilson Building.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-180, § 3, 43 DCR 4246
1981 Ed., § 9-732.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1331.